Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-172
Board; national organization or related meetings; attendance.

Each board may select one or more of its members to attend the annual meeting of the national organization of state boards of such profession or other related meetings. Any member so selected shall receive his or her necessary traveling and lodging expenses in attending such meetings on the same basis as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 24, p. 460;

C.S.1929, § 71-314;

R.S.1943, § 71-124;

Laws 1971, LB 587, § 7;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 110;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-124;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 72.